North Carolina, session 2025, HB257.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of fifty-four million dollars ($54,000,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Hoke County to be used as
follows:
(1) Eleven million dollars ($11,000,000) for water and sewer needs.
(2) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for courthouse construction overages.
(3) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for construction of a new sheriff's office
and law enforcement center.
(4) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for construction of a new workforce
training center at Sandhills Community College.
(5) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for construction of a new social services
building.
(6) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for construction of a new mental
health/rehabilitation facility.
(7) Three million dollars ($3,000,000) for capital improvements for the County's
volunteer fire departments.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of eighty-three million two hundred thousand dollars
($83,200,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to
Scotland County to be used as follows:
(1) Eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) for construction of a new courthouse and
jail facility.
(2) One million dollars ($1,000,000) to enable the Parks and Recreation
Department to upgrade the County's splash pad.
(3) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for various public capital improvements.
(4) One million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000) to build a new
EMS/fire substation in the Town of Wagram.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of thirty-three million dollars ($33,000,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the City of Laurinburg to be
used as follows:
*H257-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Four million dollars ($4,000,000) for the Town's Main Street restoration.
(2) Twenty-nine million dollars ($29,000,000) for water/wastewater capital
projects.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of twenty-four thousand eight hundred ten dollars ($24,810)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of
Gibson to be used as follows:
(1) Fifteen thousand nine hundred eighty-five dollars ($15,985) for a replacement
pump at the lagoon station.
(2) Eight thousand eight hundred twenty-five dollars ($8,825) for additional
repairs to the lagoon station to ensure proper operation.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one hundred eighty-five thousand dollars ($185,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of
Wagram to be used as follows:
(1) Thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for new water meters.
(2) One hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000) for tree root removal
and pothole repairs.
(3) Thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) to install a fence at the maintenance shop.
SECTION 6. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of six million dollars ($6,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to St. Andrews University for repairs to the
Belk Center, which suffered hurricane damage.
SECTION 7. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 257-First Edition